Utah statutes.
63A-3-406.    Submission of public financial information by a school district or charter school.

When submitting public financial information to the Utah Public Finance Website, a school district or charter school shall classify transactions in accordance with the uniform chart of accounts that school districts and charter schools are required to use for budgeting, accounting, financial reporting, and auditing purposes pursuant to rules adopted by the State Board of Education.



Enacted by Chapter 435, 2013 General Session

